Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2115
Lessor; not liable; when.

(1) A lessor shall not be liable for a violation under section 69-2113 if the lessor proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the violation was not intentional, that the violation resulted from a bona fide error, and that the lessor maintained procedures reasonably adapted to avoid such an error. A bona fide error shall include, but not be limited to, clerical, calculation, computer malfunction and programming, and printing errors. An error of legal judgment with respect to requirements of the Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act shall not be considered a bona fide error.

(2) A lessor shall not be liable under the act for any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule, regulation, or interpretation issued, adopted, or promulgated by the Attorney General, by the department, or by an official duly authorized by the Attorney General or the department even if after the act or omission has occurred the rule, regulation, or interpretation is amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

(3) With respect to the dollar amount of any disclosure required by the act, a lessor shall not be liable if the dollar amount actually disclosed is greater than the dollar amount required to be disclosed by the act.

Laws 1989, LB 681, § 15;

Laws 2001, LB 641, § 9.